src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON IJE_ODD
               +N+Sg:                    IJE_ODD_SG     ;
               +N+Pl:                    IJE_ODD_PL     ;
                  +N:                    IJE_ODD_ESS    ;
         +N+Cmp/SgNom:e%^NOMAGieDISIMP    R              ;
         +N+Cmp/SgGen:e%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPn R              ;
         +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPi  R              ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»adtj              GIERIEHTSADTJE ;

!!€gt-norm: seerije # ODD-syllable test
!!€ seerije:                 seerije+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ seerijem:                seerije+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ seerijen:	            seerije+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ seerijasse:	            seerije+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ seerijisnie:             seerije+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ seerijistie:	            seerije+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON IJE_ODD_SG
       +Nom:e%^NOMAGieDISIMP    FINAL1 ;
 +Nom+PxSg1:%>amme              FINAL1 ;
 +Nom+PxSg2:%>adth              FINAL1 ;
       +Acc:e%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPm FINAL1 ;
 +Acc+PxSg2:%>amth              FINAL1 ;
       +Gen:e%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPn FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+PxSg1:%>anne              FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+PxSg2:%>anne              FINAL1 ;
 +Gen+PxSg3:%>anne              FINAL1 ;
       +Ill:%>asse              FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse >Jesusasse
 +Ill+PxSg2:%>assedh            FINAL1 ;
       +Ine:%>isnie             FINAL1 ;
       +Ela:%>istie             FINAL1 ;
       +Com:%>inie              FINAL1 ;
 +Com+PxSg2:%>æjnedh            FINAL1 ;


LEXICON IJE_ODD_PL
         +Nom:%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPh       FINAL1 ;
         +Acc:%>idie                   FINAL1 ;
         +Gen:%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPi       FINAL1 ;
         +Ill:%>idie                   FINAL1 ;
         +Ine:%>inie                   FINAL1 ;
         +Ela:%>ijstie                 FINAL1 ;
         +Com:%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Com+Err/Orth:%>%^NOMAGieDISIMPigyjmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON IJE_ODD_ESS
 +Ess:%>inie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON DAKTERE
   +N+Der1+Der/Rec+N:             LAAHKOEH_ODD   ;
               +N+Sg:             N_ODD_SG       ;
               +N+Pl:             N_ODD_PL       ;
                  +N:             N_ODD_ESS      ;
         +N+Cmp/SgNom:e%^DISIMP    R              ;
         +N+Cmp/SgGen:e%>%^DISIMPn R              ;
         +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPi  R              ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»adtj       GIERIEHTSADTJE ;
! Test data:
!!€gt-norm: daktere # Odd-syllable test
!!€ daktere:             daktere+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ dakteren:            daktere+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ dakterem:            daktere+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ daktarasse:          daktere+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ daktarisnie:         daktere+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ daktaristie:         daktere+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ daktarinie:          daktere+N+Sg+Com
!!€ dakterh:             daktere+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ daktaridie:          daktere+N+Pl+Acc
!!€ dakteri:             daktere+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ daktaridie:          daktere+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ daktarinie:          daktere+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ daktarijstie:        daktere+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ dakterigujmie:       daktere+N+Pl+Com
!!€ daktarinie:          daktere+N+Ess
!!€ daktaradtje:         daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ daktaradtjen:        daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ daktaradtjem:        daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ daktaradtjese:       daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ daktaradtjesne:      daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ daktaradtjeste:      daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ daktaradtjine:       daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com
!!€ daktaradtjine:       daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess
!!€ daktaradtjh:         daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ daktaradtji:         daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen
!!€ daktaradtjide:       daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc
!!€ daktaradtjide:       daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ daktaradtjine:       daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine
!!€ daktaradtjijste:     daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela
!!€ daktaradtjigujmie:   daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com
!!€ daktaradtjine:       daktere+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess 


LEXICON IJEENERE_LOAN
             +Err/Orth:^eenar N_ODD ;
             +Err/Orth:^enar  N_ODD ;
             +Err/Orth:jenar  N_ODD ;
                     :jeenar N_ODD ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-SW:^ener  R     ;

!!€gt-norm: australijeenere # Even-syllable test
!!€ australijeenere:                 australijeenere+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ australijeenerem:                australijeenere+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ australijeeneren:	            australijeenere+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ australijeenaristie:             australijeenere+N+Sg+Ela


LEXICON IJAANERE_LOAN
             +Err/Orth:^aanar N_ODD ;
             +Err/Orth:^anar  N_ODD ;
             +Err/Orth:janar  N_ODD ;
                     :jaanar N_ODD ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom+Dial/-SW:^aner  R     ;

!!€gt-norm: sisilijaanere # Even-syllable test
!!€ sisilijaanere:                sisilijaanere+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ sisilijaanerem:               sisilijaanere+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ sisilijaaneren:	              sisilijaanere+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ sisilijaanaristie:            sisilijaanere+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON IJAATORE_LOAN
    +Err/Orth:^aator N_ODD ;
    +Err/Orth:^ator  N_ODD ;
    +Err/Orth:jator  N_ODD ;
             :jaator N_ODD ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom:^ator  R     ;

!!€gt-norm: radijaatore # Even-syllable test
!!€ radijaatore:                  radijaatore+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ radijaatorem:                 radijaatore+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ radijaatoren:	              radijaatore+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ radijaatorisnie:	          radijaatore+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ radijaatoristie:	          radijaatore+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ radijaatorinie:	              radijaatore+N+Sg+Com

LEXICON IJAANOVE_LOAN
    +Err/Orth:^aanov N_ODD ;
    +Err/Orth:^anov  N_ODD ;
    +Err/Orth:janov  N_ODD ;
             :jaanov N_ODD ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom:^ano   R     ;

!!€gt-norm: pijaanove # ODD-syllable test
!!€ pijaanove:                  pijaanove+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ pijaanovem:                 pijaanove+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ pijaanoven:	                pijaanove+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ pijaanovisnie:	            pijaanove+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ pijaanovistie:	            pijaanove+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ pijaanovinie:	            pijaanove+N+Sg+Com
! add some more iano-words?

LEXICON AATORE_LOAN
         :ator N_ODD      ;
  +Err/Orth:to   UVRE_LOAN  ;
 +Err/Orth:tor  N_ODD_LOAN ;

!!€gt-norm: administraatore# ODD-syllable test
!!€ administraatore:                  administraatore+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ administraatorem:                 administraatore+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ administraatoren:	              administraatore+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ administraatorisnie:	          administraatore+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ administraatoristie:	          administraatore+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ administraatorinie:	              administraatore+N+Sg+Com

LEXICON AKTORE_LOAN
        +v1:aktor  N_ODD_LOAN ;
 +v2+Err/Orth:akto   UVRE_LOAN  ;
   +Err/Orth:aaktor N_ODD      ;

!!€gt-norm: faktore# Even-syllable test
!!€ faktore:                  faktore+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ faktorem:                 faktore+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ faktoren:	              faktore+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ faktorisnie:	          faktore+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ faktoristie:	          faktore+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ faktorinie:	              faktore+N+Sg+Com

LEXICON EKTORE_LOAN
        +v1:ektor  N_ODD_LOAN ;
 +v2+Use/NG:ekto   UVRE_LOAN  ;
   +Err/Orth:eektor N_ODD      ;

LEXICON ORE_LOAN
        +v1:or N_ODD_LOAN ;
 +v2+Use/NG:o  UVRE_LOAN  ;



! Even - syllabic case inflection
! -------------------------------

! Inflection for nouns ending in '-ie'
! ------------------------------------

LEXICON BURRIE
       +v2:buer  N_IE ;
       +v1:burr  N_IE ;
       
LEXICON N_IE
 +N: N_IE_FORMS ;

LEXICON N_IE_FORMS
                     +Sg:             N_IE_SG  ;
                     +Pl:             N_IE_PL  ;
                                      N_IE_ESS ;
               +Cmp/SgNom:ie           R        ;
               +Cmp/SgGen:ie%>n        R        ;
         +Cmp/PlGen+NoUml:ie%>j        R        ;
           +Cmp/PlGen+Uml:%>%^iUMLi    R        ;
       +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%^aLATUS%»tj GÅATETJE ;
 +Der1+Der/ijes+A+Sg+Nom:%»%^1UMLijes FINAL1   ;
          +Der1+Der/ijes:%»%^1UMLijes ATTR_0   ;
          +Der1+Der/ijes:%»%^1UMLij   ODDCOMP  ;
           +Der2+Der/Car:%»eht   hts_HTS_ODDNOCOMP ;

LEXICON N_IE_SG
   N_IE_SG_NOM ;
   N_IE_SG_OBL ;
