src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx ! 
dïejketjelmie:dïejke#tjelm N_IE ;
aajkohke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:aajkoehk DAKTERE ;
aajkohke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:aajkahk DAKTERE ;
muevieheerrije+Sem/Dummytag:muevie#heerrij IJE_ODD ;
australijeenere+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:australi IJEENERE_LOAN ;
barkoemehkie+Sem/Dummytag:barkoe#mehk N_IE ;
batterieliminaatore+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:batteri#elimina AATORE_LOAN ;
buhtjije+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:buhtjiej IJE_ODD ;
daktere+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:daktar DAKTERE "gift datter" ;
duplikaatore+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:du^plika AATORE_LOAN ;
ekonomiprofessore+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:ökonomi#profess ORE_LOAN ;
faamoefaktore+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:faamoe#f AKTORE_LOAN ;
fosfore+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:fosf ORE_LOAN ;
fotomultiplikaatore+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:foto#multi^plika AATORE_LOAN ;
fuevsie+Sem/Dummytag:fuevs N_IE ;
gaartije+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:gaartij IJE_ODD ;
gassektore+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:gas#s EKTORE_LOAN ;
geellege+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:geelleg DAKTERE ;
gladijaatore+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:gladi IJAATORE_LOAN ;
indijaanere+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:indi IJAANERE_LOAN ;
instituttsektore+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:in^stitutt#s EKTORE_LOAN ;
italijeenere+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:itali IJEENERE_LOAN ;
juakadimmie+Sem/Dummytag:juakadimm N_IE ;
karbokolibakteerije+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:karbokoli#bakteerij IJE_ODD ;
kartesijaanere+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kartesi IJAANERE_LOAN ;
kommentaatore+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kommenta AATORE_LOAN ;
kompaktore+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:komp AKTORE_LOAN ;
kompressore+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kom^press ORE_LOAN ;
kontorsektore+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kontor#s EKTORE_LOAN ;
kulturfaktore+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:kultur#f AKTORE_LOAN ;
liberijaanere+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:liberi IJAANERE_LOAN ;
maanaburrie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:maana# BURRIE ;
beapmoeburrie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:beapmoe# BURRIE ;  !
gåptoeburrie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:gåptoe# BURRIE ;  !
jielehburrie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:jieleh# BURRIE ;  !
raerieburrie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:raerie# BURRIE ;  !
såajoeburrie+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:såajoe# BURRIE ;  !
mandsjurijaanere+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:mandsjuri IJAANERE_LOAN ;
maskinsektore+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:maskin#s EKTORE_LOAN ;
nestore+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:nest ORE_LOAN ;
nieskemeruevhtie+Sem/Dummytag:nieskeme#ruevht N_IE ;
numerijaanere+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:numeri IJAANERE_LOAN ;
pijaanove+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:pi IJAANOVE_LOAN ;
predaatore+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:preda AATORE_LOAN ;
primfaktore+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:prim#f AKTORE_LOAN ;
projektore+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:proj EKTORE_LOAN ;
radijaatore+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:radi IJAATORE_LOAN ;
rhesusfaktore+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:rhesus#f AKTORE_LOAN ;
rovtore+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:rovt ORE_LOAN ;
samaarije+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:samarij IJE_ODD ;
sektore+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:s EKTORE_LOAN ;
sisilijaanere+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:sisili IJAANERE_LOAN ;
skinskie+Sem/Dummytag:skinsk N_IE ;
sïbjege+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sïbjeg DAKTERE ; !Px-lexicon
teologiprofessore+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:teologi#profess ORE_LOAN ;
tjeerege+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:tjeereg DAKTERE ;
traktore+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:tr AKTORE_LOAN ;
tsavtshvierhtie+Sem/Dummytag:tsavtsh#vierht N_IE ;
visitaatore+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:visita AATORE_LOAN ;
faagebarkije+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:faage#barkij IJE_ODD ;
